Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 8
FUNDING ADVANCEMENT FOR SURFACE
TRANSPORTATION AND ECONOMIC RECOVERY

Editor's note:

This part 8 was added in 2002. This part 8 was repealed and reenacted in 2009, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 8 prior to 2009, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii or this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

43-4-801. Short title.

This part 8 shall be known and may be cited as the "Funding Advancements for Surface Transportation and Economic Recovery Act of 2009".

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part R&RE, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 10, § 1, effective March 2.

43-4-802. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The continued prosperity of the state and its citizens requires a safe, well-maintained, integrated, multimodal, and sustainable surface transportation system that is accessible in all parts of the state and that allows efficient movement of people, goods, and information;

The primary funding sources dedicated for surface transportation, state and federal motor fuel taxes, are flat rate per gallon taxes that have lost and will continue to lose much of their purchasing power because they are not indexed to inflation, have not been increased in nearly two decades, and generate less revenue per vehicle mile traveled as motor vehicles become more fuel efficient;

Due to the decline in the purchasing power of the revenues generated by the state and federal motor fuel taxes, the state and local governments have been unable to maintain, repair, reconstruct, operate, and improve surface transportation infrastructure in a strategic, timely, and efficient manner, which has already caused many bridges in the state to become structurally deficient or functionally obsolete and worsened the condition of road surfaces, delayed capacity expansion projects, and increased traffic congestion and greenhouse gas emissions; and

Because this decline in purchasing power is ongoing and becomes more severe with each passing year, the state and local governments will continue to be unable to maintain, repair, reconstruct, operate, and improve surface transportation infrastructure in a strategic, timely, and efficient manner, and the safety, efficiency, and environmental impact of the state's surface transportation system will worsen more quickly in the future if sufficient and sustainable funding sources for surface transportation cannot be found.

The general assembly further finds and declares that:

The national and state economic recession and attendant rise in unemployment represent additional short- to medium-term challenges for the state and all Coloradans;

There is an urgent present need to repair and replace structurally deficient and functionally obsolete bridges and improve highway safety in the state;

Increasing funding for designated bridge projects, tunnel projects, and road safety projects in the short- and medium-term through the imposition of bridge and road safety surcharges, a bridge and tunnel impact fee, and other new fees at rates reasonably calculated based on the benefits received by the persons paying the fees will not only provide funding to complete the projects but will also accelerate the state's economic recovery by increasing bridge, tunnel, and road construction, repair, reconstruction, and maintenance activity, as well as related economic activity, and by employing significant numbers of Coloradans;

The creation of a statewide bridge and tunnel enterprise authorized to complete designated bridge projects and tunnel projects, to impose a bridge safety surcharge and a bridge and tunnel impact fee and issue revenue bonds, and, if required approvals are obtained, to contract with the state to receive one or more loans of money received by the state under the terms of one or more financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreements authorized by this part 8 and to use the revenues generated by the bridge safety surcharge and the bridge and tunnel impact fee to repay any such loan or loans, will improve the safety and efficiency of the state transportation system by allowing the state to accelerate the repair, reconstruction, and replacement of structurally deficient, functionally obsolete, and rated as poor bridges and repair, maintain, and more safely operate tunnels;

The creation of a high-performance transportation enterprise with the authority and mission to seek out opportunities for innovative and efficient means of financing other important surface transportation infrastructure projects will ensure that such projects are also properly prioritized and accelerated; and

Granting the bridge enterprise and the transportation enterprise both responsibility for the completion, respectively, of designated bridge projects and tunnel projects and other important surface transportation projects and the flexibility to execute their respective missions in a variety of innovative ways will ensure that available resources for such projects are efficiently and effectively leveraged so that both the projects and the state's economic recovery can be completed as quickly as possible.

The general assembly further finds and declares that:

While it is necessary, appropriate, and in the best interests of the state to fund designated bridge projects, tunnel projects, and highway safety projects and stimulate economic recovery in the short- and medium-term, the state must also develop a long-term strategy to provide sustainable long-term revenue streams dedicated for the construction of important surface transportation infrastructure projects and the continuing maintenance, repair, and reconstruction of the statewide surface transportation system that will:

Allow both the state and local governments to maintain, repair, reconstruct, and improve their transportation infrastructure in a strategic, timely, and efficient manner; and

Provide the state and local governments with the resources and flexibility to explore and invest in modern multimodal and demand-side transportation solutions that will help reduce traffic congestion and greenhouse gas emissions;

The specification of additional policies to be considered at all stages of the statewide transportation planning process and the establishment of an efficiency and accountability committee within the department of transportation will help to ensure that transportation planning is thorough, integrated, and strategic and that all funding dedicated for surface transportation is expended effectively.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part R&RE, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 10, § 1, effective March 2.

L. 2021:

(2)(c), (2)(d), (2)(f), and IP(3)(a) amended, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1439, § 45, effective June 17; (2)(d) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 2064, § 82, effective July 1.

43-4-803. Definitions.

As used in this part 8, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Authorized agent" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 42-1-102 (5), C.R.S.

"Bond" means any bond, note, interim certificate, commercial paper, contract, or other evidence of indebtedness of either the bridge enterprise or the transportation enterprise authorized by this part 8, including, but not limited to, any obligation to the United States in connection with a loan from or guaranteed by the United States.

"Bond obligations" means the debt service on, and related costs and obligations in connection with, bonds, including, without limitation:

Payments with respect to principal, interest, prepayment premiums, reserve funds, surplus funds, sinking funds, and costs of issuance;

Payments related to any credit enhancement, liquidity support, or interest rate protection for bonds;

Fees and expenses of any trustee, bond registrar, paying agent, authenticating agent, rebate analyst or consultant, calculation agent, remarketing agent, or credit enhancement, liquidity support, or interest rate protection provider;

Coverage requirements; and

Other costs, fees, and expenses related to the foregoing and any other amounts required to be paid pursuant to the provisions of any documents authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

"Bridge enterprise" means the statewide bridge and tunnel enterprise created in section 43-4-805 (2).

"Bridge enterprise board" means the board of directors of the bridge enterprise.

"Bridge enterprise director" means the director of the bridge enterprise appointed pursuant to section 43-4-805 (2)(a)(I).

"Bridge special fund" means the statewide bridge and tunnel enterprise special revenue fund created in section 43-4-805 (3)(a).

"Commission" means the transportation commission created in section 43-1-106 (1).

"Department" means the department of transportation created in section 24-1-128.7, C.R.S.

"Designated bridge" means every bridge, including any roadways, sidewalks, or other infrastructure connected or adjacent to or required for the optimal functioning of the bridge, that:

Is part of the state highway system, as described in section 43-2-101; and

Has been identified by the department as structurally deficient or functionally obsolete, and has been rated by the department as poor, as of January 1, 2009, or is subsequently so identified and rated by the department.

"Designated bridge project" means a project that involves the repair, reconstruction, replacement, or ongoing operation or maintenance, or any combination thereof, of a designated bridge by the bridge enterprise pursuant to an agreement between the enterprise and the commission or department authorized by section 43-4-805 (5)(f).

"Executive director" means the executive director of the department.

"Grant" means any direct cash subsidy or other direct contribution of money from the state or any local government in the state to the bridge enterprise or the transportation enterprise that is not required to be repaid.

"Grant" does not include any of the following or any interest or income derived from the deposit and investment of the following:

Any indirect benefit conferred upon the bridge enterprise or the transportation enterprise from the state or any local government in the state;

Any federal funds received by the bridge enterprise or the transportation enterprise, regardless of whether the federal funds pass through the state or any local government in the state prior to receipt by the enterprise;

Any revenues of the bridge enterprise from the bridge safety surcharge imposed by the enterprise pursuant to section 43-4-805 (5)(g) or revenues of the bridge enterprise or the transportation enterprise from any other authorized rate, fee, assessment, or other charge imposed by either enterprise for the provision of goods or services by the enterprise;

Any moneys paid or advanced to the bridge enterprise or the transportation enterprise by the state, a local government or group of local governments, an authority, or any other government-owned business or governmental entity in exchange for an agreement by either enterprise to complete a designated bridge project or a surface transportation infrastructure project; or

Any moneys loaned by the commission to the bridge enterprise pursuant to section 43-4-805 (4) or (5)(r) or the transportation enterprise pursuant to section 43-4-806 (4).

"Highway" means a road and related improvements and services. A highway may consist of improvements and services, including, but not limited to, paving, grading, landscaping, curbs, gutters, culverts, sidewalks, bikeways, lighting, bridges, overpasses, underpasses, rail crossings, shoulders, frontage roads, access roads, interchanges, drainage facilities, transit lanes and services, park-and-ride facilities, traffic demand management facilities and services, other multimodal improvements and services, toll collection facilities, service areas, administrative or maintenance facilities, gas, electric, water, sewer, and other utilities located or to be located in the right-of-way of the highway, and other real or personal property, including easements, rights-of-way, open space, and other interests therein, relating to the financing, construction, operation, or maintenance of the highway.

"Issuing enterprise" means, with respect to the issuance of bonds as authorized by this part 8, either the bridge enterprise or the transportation enterprise.

"Local government" means a municipality, county, or city and county.

"Metropolitan planning organization" means a metropolitan planning organization under the "Federal Transit Act of 1998", 49 U.S.C. sec. 5301 et seq., as amended.

"Public-private partnership" means an agreement, including, but not limited to, an operating concession agreement between the bridge enterprise or the transportation enterprise and one or more private or public entities that provides for:

Acceptance of a private contribution to a surface transportation infrastructure project in exchange for a public benefit concerning the project other than only a money payment;

Sharing of resources and the means of providing surface transportation infrastructure projects; or

Cooperation in researching, developing, and implementing surface transportation infrastructure projects.

"Public transportation vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is part of vehicular service that transports the general public and that is provided by a public transportation district or by a local government.

"Regional planning commission" means a regional planning commission formed under the provisions of section 30-28-105, C.R.S., that prepares and submits a transportation plan pursuant to section 43-1-1103.

"Road safety project" means a construction, reconstruction, or maintenance project that the commission determines is needed to enhance the safety of a state highway, a county determines is needed to enhance the safety of a county road, or a municipality determines is needed to enhance the safety of a city street.

"Surface transportation infrastructure" means a highway, a bridge other than a designated bridge, or any other infrastructure, facility, or equipment used primarily or in large part to transport people on systems that operate on or are affixed to the ground.

"Surface transportation infrastructure project" means the planning, designing, engineering, acquisition, installation, construction, repair, reconstruction, maintenance, or operation of a defined amount of surface transportation infrastructure by:

The transportation enterprise; or

A partner of the transportation enterprise under the terms of a public-private partnership.

"Transportation enterprise" means the high-performance transportation enterprise created in section 43-4-806 (2)(a).

"Transportation enterprise board" means the board of directors of the transportation enterprise.

"Transportation enterprise director" means the director of the transportation enterprise appointed pursuant to section 43-4-806 (2)(b).

(26.5) "Tunnel project" means a project to repair, maintain, or enhance the operation of any tunnel that is part of the state highway system.

"User fee" means compensation to be paid to the transportation enterprise or a partner of the transportation enterprise for the privilege of using surface transportation infrastructure constructed or operated by the transportation enterprise or operated by its partner under the terms of a public-private partnership.

"Vehicle" means a motor vehicle as defined in section 42-1-102 (58), C.R.S.; except that, for purposes of the imposition of any surcharge, fee, or fine imposed pursuant this part 8 in connection with a vehicle required to be registered pursuant to the provisions of article 3 of title 42, C.R.S., "vehicle" also includes any vehicle without motive power that is required to be registered.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part R&RE, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 12, § 1, effective March 2.

L. 2021:

(4) and (7) amended and (26.5) added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1440, § 46, effective June 17.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 43-4-802 as it existed prior to 2009, and the former § 43-4-803 was relocated to §§ 43-4-805 and 43-4-806.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 21-260, see section 1 of chapter 250, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

43-4-804. Highway safety projects - surcharges and fees - crediting of money to highway users tax fund - definition.

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (1) is effective until January 1, 2023.] On and after July 1, 2009, the following surcharges, fees, and fines shall be collected and credited to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201 (1)(a) and allocated to the state highway fund, counties, and municipalities as specified in section 43-4-205 (6.3):

(1)

[

Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (1) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

The following surcharges, fees, and fines shall be collected and credited to the highway users tax fund created in section 43-4-201 (1)(a) and allocated to the state highway fund, counties, and municipalities as specified in section 43-4-205 (6.3):

A road safety surcharge, which, except as otherwise provided in subsections (1)(a)(III) and (1)(a)(VI) of this section, is imposed for any registration period that commences on or after July 1, 2009, upon the registration of any vehicle for which a registration fee must be paid pursuant to part 3 of article 3 of title 42 and is also imposed upon any item of special mobile machinery that is covered by a registration exempt certificate issued by the department of revenue in accordance with section 42-3-107 (16)(g). Except as otherwise provided in subsections (1)(a)(IV), (1)(a)(V), and (1)(a)(VIII) of this section, the amount of the surcharge is:

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(a)(I)(A) is effective until January 1, 2023.] Sixteen dollars for a motorcycle, as defined in section 42-1-102 (55), or any vehicle that weighs two thousand pounds or less;

(A)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (1)(a)(I)(A) is effective January 1, 2023.

]

Sixteen dollars for a motorcycle, as defined in section 42-1-102 (55); a trailer coach, as defined in section 42-1-102 (106); an autocycle, as defined in section 42-1-102 (7.5); or any vehicle that weighs two thousand pounds or less;

Twenty-three dollars for any vehicle that weighs more than two thousand pounds but not more than five thousand pounds;

Twenty-eight dollars for any vehicle that weighs more than five thousand pounds but not more than ten thousand pounds;

Thirty-seven dollars for any vehicle that is a passenger bus or that weighs more than ten thousand pounds but not more than sixteen thousand pounds; and

Thirty-nine dollars for any vehicle that weighs more than sixteen thousand pounds.

The road safety surcharge shall be imposed when a vehicle is registered as required by article 3 of title 42 or, for an item of special mobile machinery that is covered by a registration exempt certificate issued by the department of revenue in accordance with section 42-3-107 (16)(g), at the time set forth in section 42-3-107 (16)(g)(III). Each authorized agent shall remit to the department of revenue no less frequently than once a month, but otherwise at the time and in the manner required by the executive director of the department of revenue, all road safety surcharges collected by the authorized agent. The executive director of the department of revenue shall forward all road safety surcharges remitted by authorized agents plus any road safety surcharges collected directly by the department of revenue to the state treasurer, who shall credit the surcharges to the highway users tax fund.

The road safety surcharge shall not be imposed on any rental vehicle on which a daily vehicle rental fee is imposed pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (1).

The amount of the road safety surcharge imposed on any vehicle that is an item of Class A personal property, as defined in section 42-3-106 (2)(a), C.R.S., shall be the product of the amount of the surcharge imposed based on the weight of the vehicle pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) and the percentage of the item's total apportioned registration apportioned to Colorado.

The amount of the road safety surcharge imposed pursuant to this paragraph (a) shall be one-half of the amount specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) for any vehicle that is a truck or truck tractor that is owned by a farmer or rancher and is used commercially only:

To transport to market or place of storage raw agricultural products actually produced or livestock actually raised by the farmer or rancher in farming or ranching operations; or

To transport commodities or livestock purchased by the farmer or rancher for personal use in the farmer's or rancher's farming or ranching operations.

The road safety surcharge shall not be imposed on any vehicle for which the department of revenue has issued a horseless carriage special license plate pursuant to section 42-12-301, C.R.S.

Each vehicle registration fee invoice shall list the road safety surcharge separately from all other vehicle registration fees or surcharges imposed.

For any registration period that begins on or after January 1, 2022, but before January 1, 2024, the amount of each road safety surcharge imposed pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section is reduced by eleven dollars and ten cents.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (1)(b)(III) and (1)(b)(IV) of this section, a daily vehicle rental fee is imposed on all short-term vehicle rentals at the rate of two dollars per day; except that a subsequent renewal of a short-term vehicle rental is exempt from the fee to the extent that the renewal extends the total rental period beyond thirty days. The rental invoice shall list the daily vehicle rental fee separately as a Colorado road safety program fee. On and after July 1, 2022, a car sharing program, as defined in section 6-1-1202 (4), shall collect the daily vehicle rental fee for any short-term vehicle rental of twenty-four hours or longer that is enabled by the car sharing program.
(b) (I) (A) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (1)(b)(III) and (1)(b)(IV) of this section, a daily vehicle rental fee is imposed on all short-term vehicle rentals at the rate of two dollars per day; except that a subsequent renewal of a short-term vehicle rental is exempt from the fee to the extent that the renewal extends the total rental period beyond thirty days. The rental invoice shall list the daily vehicle rental fee separately as a Colorado road safety program fee. On and after July 1, 2022, a car sharing program, as defined in section 6-1-1202 (4), shall collect the daily vehicle rental fee for any short-term vehicle rental of twenty-four hours or longer that is enabled by the car sharing program.

As used in this subsection (1)(b), "short-term vehicle rental" means the rental of any motor vehicle, as defined in section 42-1-102 (58), with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand pounds or less that is rented within Colorado for a period of not more than thirty days.

A person who collects the daily vehicle rental fee imposed by subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) and who pays specific ownership tax on the vehicles rented in the manner specified in either section 42-3-107 (11) or (12), C.R.S., or both, shall, no later than the twentieth day of each month, submit to the department of revenue a report, using forms furnished by the department of revenue, of daily vehicle rental fees collected for the preceding month and shall include with the report the remittance of all such fees. A person who collects the daily vehicle rental fee imposed by subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) but does not pay specific ownership tax on the vehicles in the manner specified in either section 42-3-107 (11) or (12), C.R.S., or both, shall submit the report and the remittance of fees collected in the same manner or in such other manner as the executive director of the department of revenue may prescribe by rules promulgated in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S. The executive director of the department of revenue shall forward all daily vehicle rental fees collected to the state treasurer, who shall credit the daily vehicle rental fees to the highway users tax fund.

Because vehicle sharing is an alternative to personal vehicle ownership that reduces the number of vehicle miles traveled on the highways of the state by encouraging the use of transit and reducing the number of trips made in privately owned vehicles and thereby benefits the state by reducing traffic congestion, greenhouse gas emissions, and the amount of wear and tear on the highways, the daily vehicle rental fee imposed pursuant to this paragraph (b) shall not be imposed on any vehicle rented pursuant to a vehicle sharing arrangement if:

Under the terms of the arrangement, an organization provides passenger vehicles for the use of members of the organization who have paid a membership fee to the organization and charges an additional fee for each use of a passenger vehicle;

A member of the organization is not required to enter into a separate written agreement with the organization each time the member reserves and uses a passenger vehicle;

The average paid usage period for all passenger vehicles provided by the organization during the prior calendar year was six hours or less;

At least three-quarters of all passenger vehicle rentals made by the organization during the prior calendar year in each municipality or county in which the organization does business were made to members of the organization who maintain a residence within the city or county;

Fuel and full insurance coverage are included in the member usage rates; and

Passenger vehicles provided by the organization are stationed in self-serve locations throughout the county or municipality in which the organization does business.

For short-term vehicle rentals beginning during state fiscal year 2022-23 and for short-term vehicle rental periods beginning during any subsequent state fiscal year, the department of revenue shall annually adjust the amount of the daily vehicle rental fee for inflation. The department of revenue shall calculate the inflation adjusted amount of the short-term vehicle rental fee for each state fiscal year and shall publish the amount no later than the May 1 of the calendar year in which the state fiscal year begins.

As used in this subsection (1)(b)(IV), "inflation" means the average annual percentage change in the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, consumer price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items and all urban consumers, or its applicable predecessor or successor index, for the five years ending on the last December 31 before a state fiscal year for which an inflation adjustment to the short-term vehicle rental fee is to be made begins.

A supplemental oversize and overweight vehicle surcharge in an amount equal to the amount of the fee charged pursuant to section 42-4-510 (11)(a), C.R.S., by the department or the Colorado state patrol for the issuance of the single trip permit; except that the surcharge shall not be imposed on a vehicle if the single trip permit fee was imposed pursuant to section 42-4-510 (11)(a)(VI)(B), C.R.S.

The agency issuing an oversize or overweight vehicle single trip permit shall collect the supplemental oversize and overweight vehicle surcharge at the same time as it collects the single trip permit fee. The agency shall forward all supplemental oversize and overweight vehicle surcharges to the department, and the executive director of the department shall forward the supplemental surcharges to the state treasurer, who shall credit the surcharges to the highway users tax fund.

A supplemental unregistered vehicle fine imposed in addition to the fine imposed pursuant to section 42-6-139 (3), C.R.S., upon conviction of a misdemeanor for knowingly failing to register a vehicle within ninety days of becoming a resident of this state as required by section 42-3-103 (4)(a), C.R.S.

The supplemental unregistered vehicle fine shall be collected at the same time as the fine imposed pursuant to section 42-6-139 (3), C.R.S. The amount of the supplemental unregistered vehicle fine shall be twenty-five dollars for each month or portion of a month that the vehicle remained unregistered following the ninety-day period during which initial registration was required; except that the amount of the supplemental unregistered vehicle fine shall not exceed one hundred dollars. All supplemental unregistered vehicle fines shall be forwarded to the state treasurer, who shall credit the fines to the highway users tax fund.

Late registration fees required to be credited to the highway users tax fund pursuant to section 42-3-112 (2), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part R&RE, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 16, § 1, effective March 2.

L. 2011:

(1)(a)(VI) amended, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 249, § 20, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(1)(c)(I) amended, (HB 12-1019), ch. 135, p. 474, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(1)(b)(I) amended, (SB 14-055), ch. 88, p. 334, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

IP(1)(a)(I) and (1)(a)(I)(A) amended, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 286, § 18, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

IP(1)(a)(I) and (1)(b)(I) amended and (1)(a)(VIII) and (1)(b)(IV) added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1440, § 47, effective June 17; IP(1)(a)(I) and (1)(a)(II) amended, (SB 21-257), ch. 478, p. 3420, § 5, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

(1)(a)(VIII) amended, (HB 22-1351), ch. 159, p. 1005, § 5, effective May 16; IP(1) and (1)(a)(I)(A) amended, (HB 22-1388), ch. 475, p. 3465, § 16, effective January 1, 2023; (1)(a)(I)(A) amended, (HB 22-1043), ch. 361, p. 2588, § 30, effective January 1, 2023.